Utah statutes.
34-29-20.   False orders for employees -- Misdemeanor.
Any person who gives to an employment agent any false or unauthorized order
for employees, or who causes to be published in any newspaper or otherwise any
false or unauthorized notice or statement that employees are wanted by any
person, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
